DCM_ZAP_GRAMMAR/zap.foma
#Project Developed By David Cabestany

read lexc zap1.lexc

eliminate flags
def Lexicon;   

def Cleanup "+" -> 0 ; 												# clears the + symbols 
def Velar [k|x|g|ɣ|ɰ|ʟ] ;	
def RuleNasal  n -> ŋ || _ Velar ; 									# changes the alveolar n
def Fricative  [θ|ð|ʃ|z|s|x|ʒ|ʂ|ʐ|ç|ʝ|ɣ|χ|ʁ|ħ|ʕ] ; 

def RuleFricative  [..] -> a || Fricative _ Fricative ;				# inserts [a] sound between two fricative. 
def BackVowel [o|u] ;
def RuleVowelHarmony1 I -> u , E -> o || BackVowel (?)*  _ ; 		# changes front vowels for its corresponding back vowels
def FrontCentralVowel [a|e|i] ;
def RuleVowelHarmony2 I -> i , E -> e || FrontCentralVowel (?)*  _ ; # mantains the front vowels of the prefix

def rules 	RuleNasal .o. RuleFricative .o. RuleVowelHarmony1 .o. RuleVowelHarmony2;

regex Lexicon .o. Cleanup .o.  rules ;

pairs
